Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-640
Motor-driven cycle, defined.

(1) Motor-driven cycle means every motorcycle, including every motor scooter, with a motor which produces not to exceed five brake horsepower as measured at the drive shaft, mopeds, and every bicycle with a motor attached except for an electric bicycle. Motor-driven cycle shall not include an electric personal assistive mobility device.

(2) For purposes of this section, motorcycle does not include an autocycle.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 136;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 453;

Laws 2015, LB95, § 13;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 97;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 43.